Darbas/source/generic/lthyphen/rhyphen.tex
%This code was written by Dimitri Vulis and placed into public domain.
%There is no copyright associated with this code. Use it as you wish.
\message{Russian hyphenation}
%Set up lower and upper case translation tables
%The redundant stuff is commented out.
%\uccode'141='101 \lccode'141='141 %a
%\uccode'142='102 \lccode'142='142 %b
%\uccode'166='126 \lccode'166='166 %v
%\uccode'147='107 \lccode'147='147 %g
%\uccode'144='104 \lccode'144='144 %d
%\uccode'145='105 \lccode'145='145 %e
\uccode'031='021 \lccode'031='031 %zh
%\uccode'172='132 \lccode'172='172 %z
%\uccode'151='111 \lccode'151='151 %i
\uccode'032='022 \lccode'032='032 %\u\i
%\uccode'153='113 \lccode'153='153 %k
%\uccode'154='114 \lccode'154='154 %l
%\uccode'155='115 \lccode'155='155 %m
%\uccode'156='116 \lccode'156='156 %n
%\uccode'157='117 \lccode'157='157 %o
%\uccode'160='120 \lccode'160='160 %p
%\uccode'162='122 \lccode'162='162 %r
%\uccode'163='123 \lccode'163='163 %s
%\uccode'164='124 \lccode'164='164 %t
%\uccode'165='125 \lccode'165='165 %u
%\uccode'146='106 \lccode'146='146 %f
%\uccode'150='110 \lccode'150='150 %kh
%\uccode'143='103 \lccode'143='143 %ts
%\uccode'161='121 \lccode'161='161 %ch
%\uccode'170='130 \lccode'170='170 %sh
%\uccode'167='127 \lccode'167='167 %shch
\uccode'177='137 \lccode'177='177 %cdprime
%\uccode'165='125 \lccode'165='165 %y
\uccode'176='136 \lccode'176='176 %cprime
\uccode'013='003 \lccode'013='003 %'e
\uccode'030='020 \lccode'030='030 %yu
\uccode'037='027 \lccode'037='037 %ya
\uccode'033='023 \lccode'033='033 %yo
\uccode'034='024 \lccode'034='034 %izhitsa
\uccode'035='025 \lccode'035='035 %fita
\uccode'053='043 \lccode'053='053 %yat
%\uccode'101='101 \lccode'101='141 %A
%\uccode'102='102 \lccode'102='142 %B
%\uccode'126='126 \lccode'126='166 %V
%\uccode'107='107 \lccode'107='147 %G
%\uccode'104='104 \lccode'104='144 %D
%\uccode'105='105 \lccode'105='145 %E
\uccode'021='021 \lccode'021='031 %ZH
%\uccode'132='132 \lccode'132='172 %Z
%\uccode'111='111 \lccode'111='151 %I
\uccode'022='022 \lccode'022='032 %\u\I
%\uccode'113='113 \lccode'113='153 %K
%\uccode'114='114 \lccode'114='154 %L
%\uccode'115='115 \lccode'115='155 %M
%\uccode'116='116 \lccode'116='156 %N
%\uccode'117='117 \lccode'117='157 %O
%\uccode'120='120 \lccode'120='160 %P
%\uccode'122='122 \lccode'122='162 %R
%\uccode'123='123 \lccode'123='163 %S
%\uccode'124='124 \lccode'124='164 %T
%\uccode'125='125 \lccode'125='165 %U
%\uccode'106='106 \lccode'106='146 %F
%\uccode'110='110 \lccode'110='150 %KH
%\uccode'103='103 \lccode'103='143 %TS
%\uccode'121='121 \lccode'121='161 %CH
%\uccode'130='130 \lccode'130='170 %SH
%\uccode'127='127 \lccode'127='167 %SHCH
\uccode'137='137 \lccode'137='177 %cDprime
%\uccode'125='125 \lccode'125='165 %Y
\uccode'136='136 \lccode'136='176 %cPrime
\uccode'003='003 \lccode'003='013 %'E
\uccode'020='020 \lccode'020='030 %YU
\uccode'027='027 \lccode'027='037 %YA
\uccode'023='023 \lccode'023='033 %Yo
\uccode'024='024 \lccode'024='034 %Izhitsa
\uccode'025='025 \lccode'025='035 %Fita
\uccode'043='043 \lccode'043='053 %Yat
{% change catcodes only within the group, mostly redundant
%\catcode'141=11 %a
%\catcode'142=11 %b
%\catcode'166=11 %v
%\catcode'147=11 %g
%\catcode'144=11 %d
%\catcode'145=11 %e
\catcode'031=11 %zh
%\catcode'172=11 %z
%\catcode'151=11 %i
\catcode'032=11 %\u\i
%\catcode'153=11 %k
%\catcode'154=11 %l
%\catcode'155=11 %m
%\catcode'156=11 %n
%\catcode'157=11 %o
%\catcode'160=11 %p
%\catcode'162=11 %r
%\catcode'163=11 %s
%\catcode'164=11 %t
%\catcode'165=11 %u
%\catcode'146=11 %f
%\catcode'150=11 %kh
%\catcode'143=11 %ts
%\catcode'161=11 %ch
%\catcode'170=11 %sh
%\catcode'167=11 %shch
\catcode'177=11 %cdprime
%\catcode'165=11 %y
\catcode'176=11 %cprime
\catcode'013=11 %'e
\catcode'030=11 %yu
\catcode'037=11 %ya
%We have to resort to this little hack because the letters 'e yu zh ui ya
%cdprime cprime are coded respectively as '013 '030 '031 '032 '037 '177 '176 in
%the font, so we use ( ) * + , - / respectively to specify them in the
%patterns.
\catcode`(=11 \lccode`(='013 %'e
\catcode`)=11 \lccode`)='030 %yu
\catcode`*=11 \lccode`*='031 %zh
\catcode`+=11 \lccode`+='032 %ui
\catcode`,=11 \lccode`,='037 %ya
\catcode`-=11 \lccode`-='177 %cdprime
\catcode`/=11 \lccode`/='176 %cprime
\patterns{
 .adi2
 .al/5
 .as6k
 .avi2
 .ax1
 .be2z1u2
 .di2a
 .do1sm
 .dvo2e
 .hla2
 .ig2
 .is1ti
 .is5tr
 .iz1n
 .kri1p
 .le1m
 .l/2
 .me2*5
 .mi2nat
 .mo2g1l
 .na5v6
 .na1q2n
 .nea6
 .ne5l
 .ne1v
 .ne6vri
 .ne1z2
 .nos5k
 .ob1le
 .ob5lit
 .ob5liv
 .ob1lo
 .ob1re
 .ob1ru
 .ob/1
 .og1n
 .os2p
 .oto1m
 .ot1r
 .ot3v
 .oz2
 .po1v2
 .po1*2
 .pre1l
 .pros2
 .ra2s1ta
 .regi6o
 .sep5t
 .sop1l
 .tek1s
 .top1l
 .tran2s1
 .t/2
 .ud2l
 .uk2
 .ur6v
 .vo2sk
 .vypu2k
 .vypukl1
 .zas2
 .zau2
 .zax2
 .zo2o3
 .qa2e
 .qer2s
 .qerst5
 .qe2st1v
a1a
aa6b
a1ba
a1be
abe3s
a1bh
a1bi
a1bo
a1br
a1bu
a1by
a1b/e
a1b/i
a1b/,
a1b/)
a1b,
a1b)
a1ca
a1ce
a1ci
a1co
a1cu
a1da
ad1age
a1dc
a1de
a1di
adi2o
1adm
a1do
a1dra
ad5rez
a1du
a5dvi
a1d*
a1dy
ad/2
a1d/e
a1d/i
a1d/,
a1d/)
a1d,
a1d)
a1e
a1fa
a1fe
a1fi
a1fo
a1fu
a1f/e
a1f/i
a1f/,
a1f/)
a1f,
a1f)
a1ga
aga5s6
ag1d
a1ge
a1gi
a1gl
a1go
1agro
a3gu
a5gv
a1gy
a1g/e
a1g/i
a1g/,
a1g/)
a1g,
a1g)
a1ha
a1he
a1hi
a1ho
a1hu
a1hy
a1h/e
a1h/i
a1h/,
a1h/)
a1h,
a1h)
a1i
ai2g
a2ih
ai2ni
ai6z5
a+2ma
a1ka
a1ke
a1ki
ak1n
a1ko
akop5l
ak1s
a1ku
a1ky
a1k/e
a1k/i
a1k/,
a1k/)
a1k,
a1k)
a1la
a1le
1alg
a5li
a1lo
a1lu
a1ly
a1l/e
a1l/i
a1l/,
a1l/)
a1l,
a1l)
2a1ma
a1me
a1mi
a1mno
a1mo
1ampe
a1mu
a1my
a1m/e
a1m/i
a1m/,
a1m/)
a1m,
am1q
a1m)
a1na
a1ne
a1ni
a6nins
an2kr
a1no
a2n1ob
a1nr
an2sc
an2skr
an2sp
ans1u
an2sur
a1nu
a2n5uz
a1ny
a1n/e
a1n/i
a1n/,
a1n/)
a1n,
a1n)
2a3o
ao6k
ao2p
ao2s
a1p
a1pa
a1pe
a1pi
a1po
1app
a1pu
a1py
a1p/e
a1p/i
a1p/,
a1p/)
a1p,
a1p)
a5w
a1wa
a1we
a1wi
a1wo
a1wu
a1w/e
a1w/i
a1w/,
a1w/)
a1r6a
a1re
a1ri
a1ro
ar2t1or
a1ru
a1ry
a1r/e
a1r/i
a1r/,
a1r/)
a1r,
a1r)
a1sa
a1se
ase5p
as1h
a1si
as1k
as5let
as5l,h
as5l,m
as5mi
a1so
as3po
as1pu
ass6p
a1sta
a1ste
a1sti
a2s1tir
a1sto
as1trog
a5stry
a1stu
ast1vu
a1sty
a1st/e
a1st/i
a1st/,
a1st/)
a1st,
a6s5t,g
a6st,n
a1st)
a1su
a1s2xe
a1sy
a1s/e
a1s/i
a1s/,
a1s/)
a1s,
as1q
a1s)
a1ta
1atak
a1te
ate2s1
a1ti
a1to
a6tomn
a1tr
a1tu
at5vi
a1ty
a1t/e
a1t/i
a1t/,
a1t/)
a1t,
a1t)
a1u
a2ule
a2um
a2un
a2us
au5sk
aut1r
au2qi
a2u(
a1va
a5ve
a5vi
a1vo
a2vot
a1vu
a1vy
a1v/e
a1v/i
a1v/,
a1v/)
a1v,
a1v)
a1xa
a1xe
a1xi
a1xo
ax1ta
a1xu
a1x/e
a1x/i
a1x/,
a1x/)
a1*a
a1*e
a1*i
a1*m
a1*o
a1*u
a1**
a1*/e
a1*/i
a1*/,
a1*/)
a1*,
a1*)
a1y
a1za
az1da
a1ze
a1zi
a1zo
az1r
a5z6u
az1ve
az1vi
az1vo
a1zy
az-1
a1z/e
a1z/i
a1z/,
a1z/)
a1z,
a1z)
a1,
a,2z
a1qa
a1qe
a1qi
a1q2ne
aq5ta
a1qu
a1q/e
a1q/i
a1q/,
a1q/)
a1(1
a2(r
a1)
ba1s2k
bas1m
b1a(
6b1b
2b1c
2b1d
1be
be1dr
beg1l
be2sk
2bes3p
bess2
be2sta
bes1q
bez1d2
be2z1i
bez5v
b1f
6b1g
b1h
5bi2o
bio5s
bi5str
2b5k
1bl
2blas
b1lav
2bld
b1leg
ble2s1k
b5lim
bl1isp
b5liza
b1lom
b1lo*
2bl/
6b1m
2b1n
5boc
bo1d6r
b5oke
b5orb
bort5
bor6tr
bo1rv
bo1s
boso2b1
bos2s
5bot
bo1t2l
bo1**
bo1z
bp5l
6b1w
2br.
bra6sl
1bri
b5ryd
b5ryg
b1ryv
2br/
6b1s2
bst6
2b1t
1bu
bu1g
5bv
b1va
b1vo
b1v,
b1x
b1*
b1z6
bzd6
b-1
b/1,v
1b,
b1q
1b)
5ca.
1cam
c1b
c1c
c1d
1ce
ce5d
ce+6t5
6cenni
2c1g
1ci
2c1k
2c1l
2c1m
c1n
1co
c1o2b
2c1o2d
2c1ot
c1p
c1r
2c1s
c1t
1cv
1cy
2c1z
c5q
da2gen
2dalg
da2pr
6d1b
d1d
5deb
de1gl
de5h
de2o
des2k
de1st
de2z1a2
de2z1i2o
de2z1o2
2d1f
d1g2
d1h
di2ad
di2am
di5h
2d1inf
di2ob
di5on
di2o5s
dip5t
di2s1e
di2sto
dis1tr
2d1k
d1l
5d6le+
1d2lev
1d2lil
2d1m
dmo1s
d2ms
d1n
1dnevn
dno5d
2dny
1dn,x
5do.
2d1obl
do6bla
do1br
6dob-
do1d2
2dokt
do5mno
do1p
do2ru
do5rva
2d1o2si
do1sn
do1s2p
5dot
6dotd
doto1
1dov
do1x2
do1z
1doq
d1p
2dr.
d1ras
1d6ra*
d6ra,
d1re*
1drob
1drom
6d5roz
2drs
d1rub
d1ryv
d1r,d
2d1s
ds3kn
d1t
1dun
du2o
du1p
du1st
d1va
d1ve
dve2s1k
d1vid
5dvinu
d1vis
1dvi*
1dviz
d1vod
dvu1x
2d1x2
5d*a
d*1m
d*1r
6dz.
d1za
1dze.
d5zem
d5zi
d1zo
d-1
6d/.
1d/e
1d/,
5d/)
d1q
d1(
e1a
ea6da
ea2de
ea2z
e1ba
e1be
e1bi
e1bo
e1br
e1bu
e1by
e1b/e
e1b/i
e1b/,
e1b/)
e1b,
e1b)
e1ca
e1ce
e1ci
e1co
e1cu
e1da
e2d1ap
e1de
e1di
e2d1i)
e1do
edou5k
e1du
e6d5u6g
e5d*e
e1dy
e1d/e
e1d/i
e1d/,
e1d/)
e1d,
e1d)
e1e
e6ema
e2eva
e1fa
e1fe
e1fi
e1fo
e1fu
e1f/e
e1f/i
e1f/,
e1f/)
e1f,
e1f)
e1ga
e1gd
e1ge
e1gi
eg1la.
eg1lo
eg1ly
eg1n
eg6nat
e5g6no
e1go
e1gu
e1gy
e1g/e
e1g/i
e1g/,
e1g/)
e1g,
e1g)
e1ha
e1he
e1hi
eh1m
e1ho
eh5ob
e1hu
e1hy
e1h/e
e1h/i
e1h/,
e1h/)
e1h,
e1h)
e1i
ei2d
ei2g
ei2m
e1ka
e1ke
e1ki
ek1n
2e1ko
ek1sk
eks2p
ek1stu
e1ku
e1kv
e1ky
e1k/e
e1k/i
e1k/,
e1k/)
e1k,
e1k)
e1la
e1le
e1li
e1lo
e1lu
e1ly
e1l/e
e1l/i
e1l/,
e1l/)
e1l,
e1l)
e1ma
e1me
e5mi
em1ne
e1mo
e1mu
e1my
e1m/e
e1m/i
e1m/,
e1m/)
e1m,
em1q
e1m)
e1na
e1ne
e1ni
e1no
2enr
en5re
en1ri
e1nu
e1ny
e1n/e
e1n/i
e1n/,
e1n/)
e1n,
e1n)
2e1o
eo2b
eob1l
e2odi
e5ohl
eo6hv
eo2kon
e5ol.
e3ola
e5oly
e5ol,
e3on.
e2ona
eo2pr
eo2w
e2oro
eo2ru
eo1s
eo2sa
eo2se
eo6su
eo6sv
eo6x
eo2*
eo2q
e1pa
e1pe
e1pi
ep1le
ep5li.
e1po
ep1ta
ep5te
ep5tiq
ep1to
ep5tur
e1pu
e1py
e1p/e
e1p/i
e1p/,
e1p/)
e1p,
e1p)
e1wa
e1we
e1wi
e1wo
e1wu
e1w/e
e1w/i
e1w/,
e1w/)
e1ra
er1a(
e1re
ere1dv
ere5gn
ere1p
ere1ss
ere1zv
er2hi
e1ri
eris2
eri1sk
er6kl
e1ro
ero6b
er5tli
er1t,
e1ru
e2r1u2p
er1vat
e1ry
e1r/e
e1r/i
e1r/,
e1r/)
e1r,
e1r)
e1sa
e1sb
e1sd
e1se
e1s2g
e1si
e1sk
eskrip1
es5kur
e1sm
e1so
es1p
e2s3pu
es5ra
e1sta
e5sta.
es1tar
e1ste
e1sti
e6stig
e1sto
e1str
e1stu
e1stv
e1sty
e1st/e
e1st/i
e1st/,
e1st/)
e1st,
e1st)
e1su
es5va
e1sy
e1s/e
e1s/i
e1s/,
e1s/)
e1s,
e1s)
e1ta
e1te
e1ti
e1tl
e1to
etora5
e1tr
e1tu
e1tv
e1ty
e1t/e
e1t/i
e1t/,
e1t/)
e1t,
e1t)
e1u2
eu3to
e1va
e1ve
e1vi
ev6ku
ev2nim
ev2n,t
e1vo
6evol
evo2s
ev2p
2evr
e2vro
e1vu
e1vy
6evyd
e1v/e
e1v/i
e1v/,
e1v/)
e1v,
ev1q
e1v)
e1xa
e1xe
e1xi
e1xl
e1xo
e1xta
ex1to
e1xu
e1x/e
e1x/i
e1x/,
e1x/)
e1*a
e*a6t
e1*e
e5*i
e*1m
e1*o
e*1r
e1*u
e1**
e1*/e
e1*/i
e1*/,
e1*/)
e1*,
e1*)
e1y
e1za
ez1da
ez1dr
e1ze
e1zi
e1zo
e1zu
ez5vi
ez1vo
e1zy
e1z/e
e1z/i
e1z/,
e1z/)
e1z,
e1z)
e1,
e1qa
e1qe
e1qi
e1qu
e1q/e
e1q/i
e1q/,
e1q/)
e1(
e1)
1fa
fag1n
far5v
fa5u
fe1d
fem5n
feni6
fe2s1k
f1f
f1g
1fi
fi1d
fi6nin
fi3o
fi1s2k
f1k
1fl
f1m
2f1n
1fo
2f1obr
fo5e
2f1org
foto1
f1p
1fr6
6fr.
fra5s
f6re
fre6s5
2f1s
f1t
1ftong
f2t1r
f6tv
2f1v
f1x
1fy
6f/.
1ga
ga5dr
ga1st
ga2u
2g1b
g1c
ge2n1in
ge6ob
ge2oc
ge2od
ge2op
ge2os
g1g
2g1h
gi1s
2g1k
gko1v
6gl.
6g5la+
1glam
5glem
g1l,e
g1l,t
g1l,)
2g1m
g1ni
go1p
1gor
go2s1a
go2sb
gos1k
gos3s
go2s1tr
go1sx
go1z
2g1p
1gr
6grek
2grop
2g1s
2g5t
2g1x
g1z
g1q
g1(
hab2
2h1a2d
2h1ang
ha2t
h1ato
h1b
h1c
h1d6
he6o5
h1f6
2h1g
h1h
1hi
hie2
h1izl
h1k
h5la.
h1li
h1lu
h1ly
h1l,
h1ma
h5met
h1mi
h1n
2h1o2k
5hom
ho2pe
3hor
h5osm
h1osn
ho5t6l
ho1tv
5hou
5hoz
h1p
1hr
hri2p1
2h1s
hs2h
hs1ka
h1t
h2tk
1hu.
hu2er
2h1u2g
h1ul
h1ur
2h1u2q
1hv
6hv.
2h1ve
6h5vi
h1x
h1z
6h1q
h1(
i1a
i2af
i2a1g
i2ap
ias2
ia1sk
2i1b
i1ba
i1be
i1bi
i1bo
i1bu
i1by
i1b/e
i1b/i
i1b/,
i1b/)
i1b,
i1b)
i1ca
i1ce
i1ci
i1co
i1cu
i1da
id1c
i1de
i2de+
i1di
idi5a
idi3om
i1do
i1dr
i1du
i1dy
i1d/e
i1d/i
i1d/,
i1d/)
i1d,
i1d)
i1e
i1fa
i1fe
i1fi
i1fo
i1fu
i1f/e
i1f/i
i1f/,
i1f/)
i1f,
i1f)
i1ga
i5gd
i1ge
i1gi
i1gl
ig1n
i1go
i1gu
i1gy
i1g/e
i1g/i
i1g/,
i1g/)
i1g,
i1g)
i1ha
i1he
i1hi
i1ho
i1hu
i1hy
i1h/e
i1h/i
i1h/,
i1h/)
i1h,
i1h)
i1i
ii2z
i1ka
i1ke
i1ki
ik1n
i1ko
ik1sk
iks1tu
i1ku
i1kv
i1ky
i1k/e
i1k/i
i1k/,
i1k/)
i1k,
i5k6q
i1k)
i1la
i2l1a2c
i1le
ile1p
i1li
i1lo
i1lu
i1ly
i1l/e
i1l/i
i1l/,
i1l/)
i1l,
i1l)
i1ma
i1me
2imene
i2meno
2imen/
i5mi
im1n
i1mo
i1mu
i1my
i1m/e
i1m/i
i1m/,
i1m/)
i1m,
i1m)
i1na
in1atom
i1ne
i1ni
i1no
ino5s
in1r
ins2
5insp
i1nu
5in*
i1ny
i1n/e
i1n/i
i1n/,
i1n/)
i1n,
i1n1)
i1o
i2oc
i2oh
i2ok6
i5ole
i2opr
i3ort
ios2
i2o1sk
io5sp
io2sta
6ip
i1pa
i5pe
i1pi
i1pl
i2p1ly
i1po
i1ps
i6p5tiz
ip1tu
i1pu
i1py
i1p/e
i1p/i
i1p/,
i1p/)
i1p,
i1p)
i1wa
i1we
i1wi
i1wo
i1wu
i1w/e
i1w/i
i1w/,
i1w/)
i1ra
i1re
i1ri
i1ro
i1ru
ir5v
i1ry
i1r/e
i1r/i
i1r/,
i1r/)
i1r,
i1r)
i1sa
is1b
i1se
i1si
is1k
isk1n
is1m
i1s2ni
i1so
is1p
is2pas
i1sta
i1ste
is5tec
is1tek
i1sti
i1sto
i1stra
i1stu
ist1v
i1sty
i1st/e
i1st/i
i1st/,
i1st/)
i1st,
i1st)
i1su
i1sy
i2s-
i1s/e
i1s/i
i1s/,
i1s/)
i1s,
is1q
i1s)
i5ta
i1te
i1ti
i1tl
i1to
i6tot
i1tr
i1tu
i2t1up
it1uq
it1va
it1ve
it5vu
i1ty
i1t/e
i1t/i
i1t/,
i1t/)
i1t,
i1t)
i1u
iu2g
iu6r
iu2q
